Idaho, session 2026, S1412.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-145, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-145. IDAHO STUDENT SAFETY AND EDUCATOR DISCLOSURE ACT. (1) The
legislature finds that student safety is a paramount responsibility of the
state and that uniform statewide reporting and disclosure requirements in
the hiring of school employees is necessary to protect good faith disclo-
sures and prevent concealment of misconduct against a student.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Covered individual" means any school personnel.
(b) "Educational entity" means any school district, public char-
ter school, or private school providing instruction in kindergarten
through grade 12, inclusive, or any combination thereof.
(c) "Misconduct" means any conduct by a covered individual that vio-
lates the provisions of section 33-1208, Idaho Code, relating to educa-
tor-student relationships or the code of ethics for Idaho professional
educators relating to educator-student relationships.
(d) "Pending investigation" means any internal, administrative, reg-
ulatory, or criminal investigation that has been initiated and has not
reached a final disposition.
(3) An educational entity shall not conduct an internal review or in-
vestigation of alleged abuse, abandonment, or neglect of a child in lieu of
reporting to law enforcement as required by section 16-1605, Idaho Code.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit an educational
entity from taking administrative or employment action or conducting an
internal review or investigation after a report has been made in compliance
with section 16-1605, Idaho Code.
(4) Prior to hiring an applicant, an educational entity that is a
school district employer shall require an applicant to provide sworn written
statements disclosing any pending or prior investigations, resignations
during investigations or in lieu of contemplated disciplinary action, or
disciplinary actions involving the applicant for misconduct in connection
with employment or professional licensure or certification. Any applicant
who makes a material misrepresentation or willful omission related to the
disclosure statements or information required in this subsection shall be


subject to immediate termination of employment or rescission of such appli-
cant's offer of employment or employment contract.
(5)(a) Prior to hiring an applicant, any educational entity that is not
a school district employer shall:
(i) Require the applicant to sign a statement authorizing the ap-
plicant's current and past employers for the past ten (10) years to
provide the hiring educational entity with information regarding
any pending or prior investigations, resignations during investi-
gations or in lieu of contemplated disciplinary action, or disci-
plinary actions for misconduct involving the applicant; and
(ii) Request in writing, electronic or otherwise, that the appli-
cant's current and past employers for the past ten (10) years pro-
vide the information described in subparagraph (i) of this para-
graph, if any. The request shall include a copy of the statement
signed by the applicant provided in subparagraph (i) of this para-
graph. The process provided in section 33-1210(2), Idaho Code,
shall apply to requests made by educational entities pursuant to
this subsection.
(b) An applicant's current or past employers shall respond to any re-
quest received pursuant to this subsection. An educational entity
shall release such current and past employers, including employees
acting on behalf of an employer, from any civil liability for provid-
ing such information in good faith. A disclosure made pursuant to this
section shall be considered to be made in good faith unless the employer
knew the information disclosed was false or misleading.
(6) Any resignation during investigations or in lieu of contemplated
disciplinary action, termination, or administrative leave that occurs dur-
ing an investigation of misconduct by a covered individual shall be referred
to the Idaho professional standards commission if the covered individual
holds an Idaho educator certificate. If the Idaho professional standards
commission takes disciplinary action against a covered individual as a
result of the information it receives pursuant to this subsection, the
commission shall update the covered individual's certification status ac-
cordingly.
(7) A private school employee may bring a claim against a private school
employer under the provisions of chapter 21, title 6, Idaho Code, only if the
employee's good faith allegations made pursuant to the provisions of section
6-2104, Idaho Code, involve misconduct or a violation or suspected violation
of section 16-1605, Idaho Code. All provisions of chapter 21, title 6, Idaho
Code, shall apply to such a claim. For purposes of such claim, the private
school employer shall be considered an employer as that term is defined in
section 6-2103, Idaho Code, and the private school employee shall be consid-
ered an employee as that term is defined in section 6-2103, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.